Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXII Ownership and Conveyance of Property
CHAPTER 381 Title to Property and Restrictions on Use, Ownership, and Alienation
381.320.
Alien’s right as to personalty — As to realty if resident.

Any alien, not an enemy, may take and hold any personal property except chattels real. If such alien resides within this state he may take and hold any lands for the purposes of residence, or of occupation by him or his servants, or for the purpose of any business, trade, or manufacture, for as long as he remains a resident of the state. An alien so taking and holding shall have like rights, remedies and exemptions concerning such property as if he were a citizen of the United States.

History.

337: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The property of a corporation, the shares of which are owned partially or wholly by a nonresident alien, are not subject to the escheat provisions noted above and may be properly held by the foreign interest.

OAG 78-585

.

KRS

381.300

and this section are constitutional, but, to enforce them, an action must be filed in circuit court to escheat the property since there is no automatic reversion.

OAG 78-678

.

Real property owned by a company incorporated in the United States, the shares of which are owned partially or wholly by aliens, is not subject to the escheat provisions in KRS

381.290

to

381.340

and may be indefinitely held by the corporation, since the alien does not own real property but owns personal property (stock) as permitted by this section.

OAG 81-248

.

A foreign corporation duly qualified to do business in Kentucky may own property in Kentucky, even if all the shareholders are nonresident aliens. Also, a Kentucky corporation solely owned by a foreign corporation may own property in Kentucky.

OAG 82-291

.

This section specifically allows aliens to take and hold personal property, such as stock.

OAG 82-291

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Mazzoli & Hamilton, Immigration Considerations for the Kentucky Practitioner, Vol. 60, No. 4, Fall 1996, Ky. Bench & Bar 6.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

381.330.
Nonresident alien — Rights as to real property inherited.

If real estate passes to a nonresident alien by descent or devise, such property may be held and alienated by such nonresident alien for eight (8) years after the final settlement of the decedent’s estate from which it was acquired. If such heir or devisee is a minor, the real estate may be held for his benefit by a guardian or curator, and may be sold by proper proceeding had in conformity with the laws regulating sales of infant’s real estate, if commenced within such eight (8) years.

History.

338.

381.340.
Nonresident alien — Distribution of property on death of.

If a nonresident alien obtains possession of real estate by descent or devise, and dies before the expiration of the period limiting his right of enjoyment or sale, the right thus acquired shall pass by descent or devise. If such heir or devisee is a nonresident alien, the property of the deceased nonresident alien shall be held or disposed of within the period applicable to such alien as provided in KRS

381.290

to

381.330

.

History.

339.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

381.350.
Waste by tenant for life or years — Forfeiture — Damages.

If any tenant for life or years commits waste during his estate or term, of anything belonging to the tenement so held, without special written permission to do so, he shall be subject to an action of waste, shall lose the thing wasted, and pay treble the amount at which the waste is assessed.

History.

2328.

381.360.
Remainderman or reversioner may bring action for waste.

The action for waste may be maintained by one who has the remainder or reversion in fee simple after an intervening estate for life or years, and also by one who has a remainder or reversion for life or years only, and each of them shall recover such damages as he has suffered by the waste complained of.

History.

2329.

381.370.
Action by heir for waste done in ancestor’s lifetime.

An heir may bring and maintain an action for waste done in the lifetime of his ancestor, as well as in his own lifetime.

History.

2330.

381.380.
Waste by seller before delivery of possession.

If a vendor or tenant of land commits any waste thereon, after he has sold his interest in it, but while he remains in possession, he shall be liable to the party injured for damages.

History.

2331.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Waste, § 311.00.

381.390.
Waste by joint tenant.

If a tenant in common, joint tenant or parcener commits waste, he shall be liable to his cotenants jointly or severally for damages.

History.

2332.

381.400.
Damages when waste wantonly committed.

If, in any action for waste, the jury finds that the waste was wantonly committed, judgment shall be entered for three (3) times the amount of the damages assessed.

History.

2334.

381.410.
Action against representative of tenant — Revivor.

An action for waste may be brought against the representatives of a tenant, or if instituted in the lifetime of a tenant may be revived against his representative after his death.

History.

2335.

381.420.
Waste committed while action pending — Receiver — Injunction.

If the tenant or person in possession of any land commits or is about to commit any waste thereon, pending an action to recover or charge such land, the court in which the action is pending may order a receiver to take possession of the land, or may stay the committing of waste by injunction or restraining order.

History.

2336.

381.430.
Possession of minerals and other interests in land — Effect on possession of surface.

Wherever the mineral or other interests in or rights appurtenant to land in this state have passed, or shall hereafter pass, in any way, from a claimant in possession of the surface of the land, the continuity of the possession of such mineral, interests and rights shall not be deemed thereby to have been broken; but the possession of the surface by the original claimant thereof, from whom such mineral, interests or rights passed, or by those claiming through or under him, or by virtue of a judgment against him in an action to which the holder of the mineral, interests or rights is not a party, shall be deemed to be for the benefit of the person, his heirs and assigns, to whom the mineral, interests or rights have passed.

History.

2366a-1.

381.440.
Excavations in a city of the first class and consolidated local government — Protection of adjacent property.

Whenever the owner of a lot in a city of the first class or a consolidated local government proposes to excavate upon the lot to a depth greater than ten (10) feet below the top of the curbstone of the sidewalk adjoining the lot, he shall, at his own expense, protect any wall on adjoining land near the excavation from injury from such excavation, if the necessary license is afforded him to enter upon the adjoining land for that purpose, but not otherwise.

History.

3037a: amend Acts 2002, ch. 346, § 228, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Protection of property adjacent to coal mines, KRS

352.490

,

352.500

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Edmonds, Some Aspects of Lateral Support in Kentucky, 39 Ky. L.J. 88 (1950).

381.445.
Abutting property owner in cities of first class under responsibility to remedy defective sidewalks — Liability to persons or property arising out of failure to repair — Director of public works may cause repairs to be made, when — Liability of city. [Repealed.]

381.450.
Tenants may remove improvements from city lots, when.

Owners of particular estates of freehold in possession or in estates for years, in unimproved or unproductive lots in cities in which other persons are the owners of the reversion or remainder, may, within ninety (90) days after the interest or estate in such lots ceases, remove any improvements they have erected thereon.

History.

2366.

381.460.
Occupant in good faith to be paid for improvements.

If any person, believing himself to be the owner by reason of a claim in law or equity founded on a public record, peacefully occupies and improves any land, and the land, upon judicial investigation, is held to belong to another, the value of the improvements shall be paid by the successful party to the occupant, or the person under whom and for whom he entered and holds, before the court rendering judgment or decree of eviction causes the possession to be delivered to the successful party.

History.

3728.

381.470.
Proceedings to ascertain value of improvements.

At the request of either party, the court in which the judgment or decree of eviction is rendered shall impanel a jury of twelve (12) discreet and impartial freeholders, not kin to either party, to meet upon the premises recovered, on a day named in the summons.

History.

3729: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 303, effective January 2, 1978.

381.480.
Oath of jurors.

The clerk of the court shall administer to the jurors, after they have been selected, the following oath: “Each of you do solemnly swear, that you will impartially, and to the best of your skill and judgment, discharge the duties required of you in the present case, by the provisions of the law concerning occupying claimants.”

History.

3730: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 304, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Oath to Jurors Where Occupying Claimants, Form 11.11.

381.490.
Inquest — Proceedings — Duty of court.

The court shall swear the witnesses, preside over the inquest and trial, decide all matters of law, preserve order, and may adjourn from day to day until the jury has completed the inquest. In case the jury first summoned fails to attend, or, after being sworn, fails to agree and render their verdict, the court shall summon another jury, on a day to be named in his mandate in writing. The court shall make out and return to the clerk’s office from which the writ issued, a complete record of the proceedings before him, together with the original writ, the verdict, and assessment of the jury, certified by him. Either party shall have the right of challenge to the jurors allowed in civil cases, and any deficiency in the jury may be supplied by summoning others.

History.

3731: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 305, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Selection of jury, challenges, KRS

29.270

,

29.290

.

381.500.
Assessment of damages.

After the jury has been sworn, it shall, from an examination of the premises, and upon such legal evidence as either party may produce, assess:

The damages, if any, which may have been done the land by cultivation and unnecessary waste of timber after the suit was instituted;

The rents and profits which have accrued after final judgment or decree of eviction; and

The value of the improvements upon the land from which the occupant is to be evicted, to be estimated as of the time the jury is impaneled. The inquest and verdict shall be signed by the jurors.

History.

3732.

381.510.
Inquest may be quashed and new writ awarded.

The court to whom the inquest is returned may, upon the motion of either party, for good cause, quash the inquest, and award a new writ as often as it is deemed necessary to the ends of justice.

History.

3733.

381.520.
Witnesses — How summoned.

The clerk issuing the writ, or the justice summoned to preside, shall issue summons for the witnesses, whose attendance shall be coerced by the justice as in other cases.

History.

3734.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Production of witnesses, KRS

421.110

to

421.180

.

381.530.
Copies of inquest — Fees of sheriff.

The clerk shall make out two (2) copies of the inquest, and deliver one (1) to each party on request. The party demanding the inquest shall pay to the sheriff, for his services, four dollars ($4), which shall be taxed in the bill of costs against the adverse party, if the court gives judgment for any amount against him.

History.

3735: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 306, effective January 2, 1978.

381.540.
Trial on return of inquest — Rents.

The inquest, when returned, shall be docketed as other causes. The court shall, after deducting the lesser from the greater assessments, give judgment for the remainder in favor of the occupant or successful claimant. The rent, from the day of the inquest until the time fixed for issuing the writ of possession, shall be computed by the court at the same rate per year as that fixed by the jury for the previous years.

History.

3736: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 307, effective January 2, 1978.

381.550.
Lien of occupant.

The occupant shall have a lien upon the land recovered from him to satisfy the judgment, and may enforce it by suit in equity, order of court, or other procedure.

History.

3737.

381.560.
Judgment for lien satisfied if all land taken.

Satisfaction of a judgment in favor of an occupant for improvement must be sought by the enforcement of the lien given in KRS

381.550

, and if, in the enforcement thereof, all the land recovered by the successful claimant is taken, the judgment shall be deemed to be satisfied.

History.

3738.

381.570.
Growing crop.

The occupant shall be entitled to the crop growing on the land at the time of judgment of eviction and order for possession. If any part of the land, at the time of eviction, has no crop growing upon it, the court may order the possession of such part to be delivered at any time.

History.

3739.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Emblements on land of deceased, KRS

395.350

.

Growing crops, effect on execution or sale, KRS

426.170

.

381.580.
Purposes for which private passway may be established — Commissioners to make report. [Repealed.]

381.590.
Orders to owners. [Repealed.]

381.600.
Examination and confirmation of report. [Repealed.]

381.610.
Exceptions to be tried by jury — Damages — Cost. [Repealed.]

381.620.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

381.630.
Use of passage not exclusive — Payment for joint use. [Repealed.]

381.635.
Right of condemnation of underground passageway to mine.

Whenever it is necessary for the owner of land to have access over, under or through the land of one or more other persons, for the purpose of operating a coal mine or other mine, and marketing the products therefrom, and access over the surface of the land of such other persons, for the purpose, would be impracticable, but there exist shafts, slopes, passageways or entries below the surface of the land of such other persons, suitable for the purpose and which could be used for the purpose without undue or unreasonable inconvenience to the owner thereof, or there exist coal seams or other strata below the surface of the land of such other persons, through which shafts, slopes, passageways or entries may be made without unreasonable inconvenience to the owner thereof, the right to use, or to make and use, such shafts, slopes, passageways or entries may be condemned under the procedure set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, subject to the exceptions prescribed in KRS

381.636

. The right of use so condemned shall include the right to install tracks, power lines, lights, ventilating equipment, and other things necessary for satisfactory use. And provided further that in any case where the rights or uses herein provided for are sought to be condemned through any land already devoted to mining purposes, if such proposed rights or uses in any wise interfere with or disrupt any approved mining methods, plans or practices, as established or projected as a part of a general plan of mining to conform to or comply with any safety provisions, rules or regulations under the existing mining laws of the state of Kentucky or of the United States of America as now in effect or hereafter enacted, such rights or uses shall be conclusively presumed to be undue and unreasonable inconvenience to the owner within the meaning of this section and KRS

381.636

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 5, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 308, effective January 2, 1978.

381.636.
Findings required by commissioners in condemnation of underground passageway — Basis of compensation — Immediate possession.

All of the provisions of the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky shall be applicable for the purposes of KRS

381.635

and this section, except as follows:

The commissioners shall be required to find, in addition to their other findings, that access over the surface of the land would be impracticable, and that the use or making and use of the shafts, slopes, passageways or entries would not cause undue or unreasonable inconvenience to the owner thereof.

Compensation shall be determined in accordance with what will constitute just compensation to the owner of the shafts, slopes, passageways or entries for the use thereof, and not on the basis of an actual taking of the land. Where the right to make a shaft, slope, passageway or entry is condemned, the condemnor shall be required to pay compensation for the value of any merchantable coal or other mineral that may be removed from the land in making the shaft, slope, passageway or entry, and for any incidental damages arising therefrom.

At the time of examining the report of the commissioners, the court shall enter an order granting the applicant the immediate use of the right of access sought to be condemned, notwithstanding the filing of exceptions by the owners, if:

The report of the commissioners favors condemnation; and

The person seeking condemnation has paid into court the amount of compensation fixed by the commissioners, and has filed with the court a bond, with sureties approved by the court, conditioned upon his paying to the owner or owners the difference between the sum paid into court and that which may thereafter be finally determined, in the proceeding, to be the value of the right of access, and further conditioned that, if it is finally determined in the proceeding that the person is not entitled to condemn the right of access, he will pay to the owner or owners damages for his use pending such final determination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 5, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 309, effective January 2, 1978.

381.640.
Joint owners of private passway to share costs.

Where two (2) or more persons in this state have acquired real estate, not exceeding twenty (20) feet in width, sufficient for a passway to benefit their lands along side of, or near the proposed passway, the owners of such passways who are benefited thereby shall pay all the costs expended for the passway or the opening of and fixing the passway for travel.

The owners of such passways shall bear jointly all the necessary expense of repairs, reconstruction and maintenance, including the necessary fencing thereof, and shall cause the necessary work to be done.

History.

3779b-1, 3779b-2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Division fences, KRS

256.020

.

381.650.
Enforcement of payment of joint expenses.

The collection of indebtedness for liability imposed by KRS

381.640

may be enforced by a proceeding in a court of equity; and the lands benefited by those who own such passways will be subjected to a lien for the due portion of such expense that may be necessarily incurred. Enough of the property of any delinquent owner may be sold by a proceeding in equity to pay his portion of such assessment.

History.

3779b-2.

381.660.
Condemnation for underground water pipes.

When the owner or lessee of a salt, or other well or spring, or stream or body of water, desires to convey the water therefrom to a point more convenient by means of pipes underground, he may, if necessary, condemn the use of so much land of another as is needed for the purpose. The procedure for condemnation shall be that set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

4360: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 140, § 118.

381.670.
Owner’s consent required for certain routes.

No such route shall pass through the yard or garden, or between the dwelling and spring or other buildings of any owner or occupant of land, without the consent, in writing, of the owner and occupant.

History.

4361.

381.680.
Person condemning land may enter it, when.

By virtue of the judgment of the court, the party to whom the privilege has been granted shall have the right to ingress and egress upon the premises to erect and repair the pipes necessary to conduct the water.

History.

4362.

381.690.
Protection of burial grounds by cities.

Whenever any burial grounds lie within the corporate limits of a city the governing authorities of the city shall protect the burial grounds from being used for dumping grounds, building sites, playgrounds, places of entertainment and amusement, public parks, athletic fields or parking grounds.

History.

2741p-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cemetery belonging to first-class city, KRS

87.110

.

Eminent domain for burial purposes, KRS

416.210

.

381.695.
Care of cemeteries and burial grounds — Legislative bodies of counties and cities may prescribe requirements. [Repealed.]

381.697.
Cemeteries maintained by legal owners.

Every cemetery in Kentucky except private family cemeteries shall be maintained by its legal owner or owners, without respect to the individual owners of burial plots in the cemetery, in such a manner so as to keep the burial grounds or cemetery free of growth of weeds, free from accumulated debris, displaced tombstones, or other signs and indication of vandalism or gross neglect.

The owner or owners of public or private burial grounds, regardless of size or number of graves, shall protect the burial grounds from desecration or destruction as stipulated in KRS 525.115(1)(a), (b), or (c) or from being used for dumping grounds, building sites, or any other use which may result in the burial grounds being damaged or destroyed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the owner or owners of public or private burial grounds when the public or private burial grounds have been desecrated, damaged, or destroyed as the result of a crime by another as defined by KRS

500.080

.

The owner or owners of private burial grounds shall be required to construct cemetery protection structures only if the burial ground is located in a county with a county cemetery board and if the board provides compensation to the private burial ground owner for supplies, labor, and other expenses associated with such construction.

The governing authorities of any city within whose corporate limits any public or private burial grounds lie may require the owner or those having claims to the grounds to properly care for them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 284, § 2; 2002, ch. 276, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2016 ch. 22, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

381.700.
Care of burial grounds by owners. [Repealed.]

HISTORY:

2741p-2; repealed by 2016 ch. 22, § 8, effective July 15, 2016.

381.710.
Evidence of dedication or use of land as burying ground.

The fact that any tract of land has been set apart for burial purposes and that a part or all of the grounds has been used for burial purposes shall be evidence that such grounds were set aside and used for burial purposes. The fact that graves are not visible on any part of the grounds shall not be construed as evidence that such grounds were not set aside and used for burial purposes.

History.

2741p-3.

381.715.
Burial rights in cemetery lots — Abandonment — Resale by cemetery.

As used in this section, “cemetery lot” is a lot containing one (1) or more grave spaces and located within a cemetery registered pursuant to KRS

367.946

in a county containing an urban-county government or in a city.

An officer of the cemetery may cause to be filed, on behalf of the cemetery, an action in the Circuit Court of the county where the cemetery is located requesting that the burial rights in the unused portion of the lots in question be deemed abandoned and that the cemetery be authorized to sell the rights upon entry of the court’s judgment. The defendants in the action shall be the unknown heirs of the original owner of the burial rights in the lots in question.

The petition shall include the following:

The name of the original owner of the burial rights in the lots in question.

The name of all persons buried in the lots and the date of burial, if known.

The name, address, and telephone number of the cemetery office.

An affidavit by the petitioner that:

No person has been buried in the cemetery lots in question for a period of at least one hundred (100) years; and

The identity of any owner of the burial rights in the lot in question or any heir of the owner is unknown to any officer or employee of the cemetery and not discoverable after a good faith attempt by an officer or employee to identify the owner or heir.

Service of process shall be by warning order attorney, appointed by the court pursuant to CR 4.07.

If the court finds the allegations set forth in paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of this section to be true, the court shall enter judgment deeming the burial rights in the lots in question abandoned and authorizing the cemetery to sell the rights.

No judgment shall be entered declaring burial rights abandoned if an owner or heir of a cemetery lot has filed with the cemetery a statement in writing directing that certain grave spaces not be used.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 267, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

381.720.
Abandoned cemetery in cities — Proceedings to vest title in city.

Whenever in the opinion of the legislative body of a city a cemetery located within the boundaries of such city has been abandoned and the land comprising the said cemetery is needed for a public purpose, an ordinance may be enacted declaring such cemetery, as described by metes and bounds, to be abandoned and authorizing the city attorney to institute suit for the city or other governmental agency created by the city in the Circuit Court of the county in which the city is located against the property comprising the cemetery to declare the said cemetery abandoned and to vest title thereto in the said city, or any governmental agency created by it pursuant to or by authority of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 29, § 1; 1964, ch. 24, § 1; 2014, ch. 92, § 305, effective January 1, 2015.

381.730.
Notice of suit.

Upon the filing of the complaint the city or other governmental agency created by the city shall give notice thereof by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 29, § 2; 1964, ch. 24, § 2.

381.740.
Assertion of claim to compensation for value of interest in cemetery or lot.

Within thirty (30) days after the last advertisement, any party having a claim to the cemetery or any lot therein or to the mortal remains of a person interred therein, may file his claim in the said proceeding for damages as compensation for the value of his interest in the cemetery or lot to which he has claim. Upon the filing of the aforesaid claim the circuit court shall appoint as commissioners three (3) impartial housekeepers who are owners of land. They shall be sworn to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties. The commissioners shall view the land involved and they may hear evidence or make any inquiry they desire touching the value thereof and award to the claimants who are owners thereof the value of the property taken. They shall return a written report to the office of the clerk of the circuit court describing separately the property which is the subject of each claim. Either the claimant or the complainant may file exceptions to this report and demand a jury trial. The commissioners shall be allowed a reasonable fee which shall be taxed as cost.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 29, § 3; 1964, ch. 24, § 3.

381.750.
Judgment — Removal of bodies and monuments.

If no claim is made within thirty (30) days after the last advertisement, or if claims have been made and compensation duly paid either to the claimants or into court, the court shall declare the cemetery to be abandoned and enter judgment accordingly, vesting fee simple title in the complainant. Thereafter claimants shall have thirty (30) days in which to remove the mortal remains and monuments from lots to which they have been adjudged to have claim, the reasonable cost thereof to be paid by the claimant. If, within thirty (30) days after entry of judgment said remains have not been removed by the claimants thereto, it shall be the duty of such complainant, through its proper officers, to pay for the removal of the monument and the disinterment, removal, and the reinterment of such body, or bodies, in such other cemetery in the county in which said city is located as the protesting lot owner may designate, or if no designation be made, to another suitable cemetery in the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 29, § 4; 1964, ch. 24, § 4.

381.755.
Removal of grave or cemetery on application of landowner or county — Procedure — Expenses.

Upon application of the owner of property upon which is located an abandoned grave or cemetery or whenever the fiscal court of any county deems it to be in the best interest of the county to remove and relocate any such grave or cemetery the court may issue an order or resolution authorizing such removal or relocation.

The order or resolution for the removal and relocation of the grave or cemetery pursuant to subsection (1) shall specify and declare that at any time after the expiration of sixty (60) days after the first publication of notice of such intended action pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, the court shall direct the removal and relocation of the grave or cemetery.

Expenses for removal and relocation of any grave or cemetery under the provisions of this section shall be paid by the individual requesting such removal or if the removal is made in the best interest of the county the expenses shall be paid from county funds.

Any grave or cemetery removed under the provisions of this section shall be relocated in a suitable place at the expense of the person or county requesting such removal and relocation.

For the purposes of this section a grave or cemetery shall be considered abandoned when left untended for a period of ten (10) years preceding the date of the resolution for removal and relocation of the grave or cemetery.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 251, §§ 1 to 5.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A landowner should address his application for removal and relocation of an abandoned grave or cemetery to the county fiscal court.

OAG 78-173

.

The owner of mineral rights would not have the kind of ownership rights required by the abandoned cemetery statute and is not able to make an application to the fiscal court for removal and relocation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

OAG 79-48

.

If a city-owned cemetery had not been abandoned so as to authorize the desecration of the existing graves, the city could reuse the land as a cemetery only after making application with the fiscal court to authorize the removal and relocation of the graves that already existed.

OAG 83-265

.

381.760.
Cost of proceeding — Burden of proof.

The cost of the proceeding shall be borne by the complainant, and the burden of proof shall be upon the claimant to establish his interest and to establish that it has not been abandoned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 29, § 5; 1964, ch. 24, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Measure of damages for condemnation of cemetery lands. 42 A.L.R.3d 1314.

381.765.
Disinterment, removal, and reinterment of graves by Commonwealth, political subdivision or electric power company; Removal by licensed funeral director.

If disinterment, removal, and reinterment of graves is effected by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its agencies, public institutions, or political subdivisions, the United States of America or any agency thereof, or any electric power or lighting company, such disinterment, removal, and reinterment shall be performed by a funeral director duly licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 316; provided, however, a person holding a valid funeral director’s license of another state may perform disinterment, removal and reinterment if the state in which such person is licensed has a reciprocal agreement whereby a license granted under the provisions of KRS Chapter 316 is recognized and accepted in that state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 237, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

381.767.
Contracts exempt from KRS 381.765.

The provisions of KRS

381.765

shall not affect grave removals for which contracts have been entered into prior to June 17, 1978.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 237, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

381.770.
Abatement of nuisance — Exceptions — Enforcement ordinance — Lien — Personal liability of property owner. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 9; 1968, ch. 10; 1970, ch. 99, § 1; 1972, ch. 108, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 509, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 145, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 298, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 179, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2011, ch. 95, § 10, effective June 8, 2011; 2015 ch. 19, § 43, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2016 ch. 86, § 18, effective January 1, 2017.

381.775.
Voluntary agreement with property owner for demolition or removal of dilapidated building.

As used in this section:

“Dilapidated building” means a structure, including but not limited to manufactured or mobile homes as defined in KRS

227.550

, which has become unfit and unsafe for human habitation, occupancy, or use or which is dangerous or injurious to the health or safety of the occupants of the building, the occupants of neighboring buildings, or other residents of the county; and

“Relative” means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son, daughter, aunt, uncle, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, or first cousin.

A county may enter into a voluntary agreement with a property owner for the demolition or removal of a dilapidated building.

The agreement shall at least include the following terms and conditions:

A clear description of the building or buildings to be demolished or removed;

Responsibilities of each party to the agreement for disposition of the demolition debris, solid wastes, asbestos materials, or other potential environmental contamination consistent with the requirements of KRS Chapter 224;

A method for establishing the fair market value and an agreement for the disposition of materials, fixtures, or other objects on the property or to be removed from the property, and an itemized list of the materials, fixtures, or other objects to be removed from the property which may be attached to the agreement as an addendum; and

A clear description of the work to be performed and the final condition of the property upon completion of disposition activities.

Each agreement may include terms and conditions for remuneration to the county up to the cost of demolition or removal activities on the property. If remuneration is to be provided to the county, terms and conditions describing the remuneration to be provided shall be included in the agreement. If the county agrees to accept responsibility for removal of materials, fixtures, or other objects from the property, any excess value received from the materials, fixtures, or other objects removed from the property shall be retained by or returned to the property owner in accordance with the agreement for the disposition.

A county shall expend funds necessary to insure any of its employees, officials, and property against any liability or property damage arising out of an act or omission committed in the scope and course of performing work in accordance with an agreement under the provisions of this section for the removal and disposition of materials, fixtures, or other objects located on the owner’s property.

Each agreement shall include the following statement in boldface type “No property owner is required to enter into an agreement under the provisions of KRS

381.775

for the removal and subsequent disposition of materials, fixtures, or other objects located on the owner’s property subject to the agreement. Any agreement under the provisions of KRS

381.775

is strictly voluntary.”

The county shall, in writing and by first-class mail, provide notice to all property owners contiguous to the property on which the dilapidated building exists that the building is to be demolished or removed. That notice shall contain the date of commencement of the demolition or removal of the building and the address of the property on which the building exists. The notice shall be mailed no less than two (2) weeks prior to the date of commencement of the demolition or removal of the building.

No elected or appointed official or employee of the county, or a relative of an official or employee of the county, shall enter into an agreement under the provisions of this section for the demolition or removal of a dilapidated building on their property. No official or employee of the county, or a relative of an official or employee of the county, shall knowingly own or have a direct or indirect financial or pecuniary interest in any agreement or property subject to an agreement entered into under the provisions of this section. If an official, employee, or relative of an official or employee owns or has a direct or indirect financial or pecuniary interest in any agreement or property subject to an agreement entered into under the provisions of this section, the official or employee shall immediately disclose, in writing, that interest to the legislative body, and the disclosure shall be entered in the minutes of the legislative body. Failure to so disclose that interest shall constitute official misconduct in the first degree, in accordance with KRS

522.020

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 73, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.